Massachusetts, session 194th, H3873.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 33 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, in Section 15(a), in line
3, by adding after the word “general.” the following:
“The adjutant general shall be the commanding general of all military forces, organized
militia units, and the military division of the Commonwealth.”
And by striking, in Section 15(b), the following: “provided, however, that the adjutant
general shall not personally exercise command of troops.”
of 1